Hawaii statutes.
§172-11 Land patents on land commission
awards; to whom, for whose benefit. Every land patent issued upon an award
of the board of commissioners to quiet land titles, shall be in the name of the
person to whom the original award was made, even though the person is deceased,
or the title to the real estate thereby granted has been alienated; and all
land patents so issued shall inure to the benefit of the heirs and assigns of
the holder of the original award. [L 1872, c 21, §1; RL 1925, §568; RL 1935, §1587;
RL 1945, §4641; RL 1955, §100-11; HRS §172-11]

Case Notes

Land commission award
held good against later royal patent. 1 H. 69; 1 H. 90. Award cannot be
collaterally attacked. 1 H. 90.

Certificate of award
of land commission, with its accompanying survey, are admissible in evidence.
2 H. 202.

Patents based as
awards do not confer or confirm title of later holders. It is merely a
quitclaim interest of the government in lands. 3 H. 783; 11 H. 587, 589.

Court is inclined not
to disturb award of land commission long adjudicated. 5 H. 354.

Mahele of 1848
considered and defined. 6 H. 195.

Award may be to
deceased person; heirs must determine their own respective rights. 15 H. 648.

Section does not
authorize the issuance of grant to deceased person. 26 H. 382, 397.

Review of case law
and effect of patent. 49 H. 429, 421 P.2d 570.

Cited: 35 H. 608,
630, 658.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next